California, session 20252026, SB999.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 61050 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:61050. (a) On or before March 1, 2022, and annually on or before March June 1 thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall report to the Legislature on information regarding this part and Title 24 (commencing with Section 100700) and Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code, including all of the following:(1) The total number of applicable households paying the penalty and the total number of dependents for whom applicable households pay the penalty, by county and by adjusted gross income class.(2) The total penalty amounts imposed, by county and by adjusted gross income class.(3) The total statewide penalty amount imposed.(4) The total number of exemptions applied, and the most common qualifications for exemptions applied.(5) The number of applicable households who pay the penalty and the number of dependents claimed by applicable households who pay the penalty, by federal poverty level category. The federal poverty level shall be estimated using adjusted gross income and number of individuals in the tax household, using the following categories:(A) At or between 0 percent and 138 percent of the federal poverty level.(B) At or between 139 percent and 266 percent of the federal poverty level.(C) At or between 267 percent and 400 percent of the federal poverty level.(D) At or above 401 percent of the federal poverty level.(6) The number and amount of state financial subsidies paid and adjustments made through reconciliation, by county and by federal poverty level category as described in paragraph (5).(b) The report shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.